Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB553.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Conveyance in the City of Harrisburg, Dauphin County.<--<--1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526272829 (a) Authorization.--The Department of General Services, with the approval of the Governor, is hereby authorized on behalf of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania to grant and convey to the Susquehanna Regional Transportation Authority certain land and buildings situate in the City of Harrisburg, Dauphin County, for $340,000, under terms and conditions to be established in an agreement of sale.(b) Property description.--The property to be conveyed under subsection (a) consists of approximately 2.857 acres and improvements thereon, bounded and more particularly described as follows:ALL THAT CERTAIN tract of land situate in the City of Harrisburg, Dauphin County, Pennsylvania, being more fully bounded and described as follows, to wit:All that certain tract of land situate in the City of Harrisburg, Dauphin County, Pennsylvania, according to a survey prepared by Susquehanna Civil Inc, dated August 18, 2022, and being more fully bounded and described as follows, to wit:Beginning at a 5/8" rebar set on the eastern legal right-of-way line of North Cameron Street, and being South 15 degrees 16 minutes 47 seconds East for a distance of 300.91 feet from the southerly right-of-way line of Goodwill Drive;THENCE North 60 degrees 52 minutes 36 seconds East for a distance of 123.71 feet to a point on the eastern legal right-of-way line of Florence Street;THENCE along the eastern legal right-of-way line of Florence Street, North 15 degrees 16 minutes 55 seconds West for a distance of 271.31 feet to a 5/8" rebar found at the intersection of the southern legal right-of-way line of Goodwill Drive and the eastern legal right-of-way line of Florence 20250HB0553PN1938 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Street;THENCE along the southern legal right-of-way line of Goodwill Drive, North 74 degrees 43 minutes 05 seconds East for a distance of 384.00 feet to a 5/8" rebar at the intersection of the southern legal right-of-way line of Goodwill Drive and the western legal right-of-way line of Dr. Claude E. Nichols Street;THENCE along the western legal right-of-way line of Dr. Claude E. Nichols Street, South 15 degrees 16 minutes 55 seconds East for a distance of 176.70 feet to a 5/8" rebar set;THENCE North 60 degrees 52 minutes 36 seconds East for a distance of 33.78 feet to a 5/8" rebar set on the line of lands of the Harrisburg Cemetery Association;THENCE along the lands of the Harrisburg Cemetery Association, South 16 degrees 39 minutes 58 seconds East for a distance of 61.58 feet to a point in the State Street Ramp from North Cameron Street to 13th Street;THENCE in and through the said State Street Ramp, South 58 degrees 58 minutes 47 seconds West for a distance of 559.38 feet to a point on the eastern legal right-of-way line of North Cameron Street;THENCE along the eastern legal right-of-way line of North Cameron Street, North 15 degrees 16 minutes 47 seconds West for a distance of 81.00 feet to the place of beginning.Containing 2.857 acres or 124,449 square feet, gross.(c) Subject to certain matters.--The conveyance shall be made under and subject to all lawful and enforceable easements, servitudes and rights of others, including, but not confined to, highway rights-of-way, including without limitation the right-of-way for the State Street Bridge, SR 3014, and the right-of-way for the ramp to 13th Street adjoining such bridge, SR 3028, 20250HB0553PN1938 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 streets, roadways and rights of any telephone, telegraph, water, electric, gas or pipeline companies, as well as under and subject to any lawful and enforceable estates or tenancies vested in third persons appearing of record, for any portion of the land or improvements erected thereon.(d) Prohibitions.--Any conveyance authorized under this section shall be made under and subject to the condition, which shall be contained in the deed of conveyance, that no portion of the property conveyed shall be used as a licensed facility, as defined in 4 Pa.C.S. § 1103 (relating to definitions), or any other similar type of facility authorized under State law. The condition shall be a covenant running with the land and shall be binding upon the grantee, its successors and assigns. Should the grantee, its successors or assigns, permit any portion of the property authorized to be conveyed in this section to be used in violation of this subsection, the title shall immediately revert to and revest in the grantor.(e) Conditions and restrictions.--The Secretary of General Services may include in the deed of conveyance any covenants, conditions or restrictions on the property as determined to be in the best interests of the Commonwealth.(f) Easements.--The Department of General Services is hereby authorized, on behalf of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania, to grant any easements benefiting the property to be conveyed, or to retain any easements from the property to be conveyed, as the Secretary of General Services shall determine to be necessary or appropriate.(g) Deed.--The conveyance shall be made by special warranty deed to be executed by the Secretary of General Services in the name of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania.20250HB0553PN1938 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (h) Costs and fees.--Costs and fees incidental to this conveyance shall be borne by the grantee.(i) Alternative disposition.--In the event that this conveyance is not executed within 24 months after the effective date of this subsection, the property may be disposed of by a competitive bidding process in accordance with section 2405-A of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929, except that no property disposition plan shall be required.(j) Proceeds.--The proceeds from the conveyance authorized by this section shall be deposited into the General Fund.Section 2. Transfer of easement interest in lands in Overfield Township, Wyoming County.(a) Authorization.--In accordance with the requirements of section 20(b) of the act of June 22, 1964 (Sp.Sess. 1, P.L.131, No.8), known as the Project 70 Land Acquisition and Borrowing Act, the General Assembly authorizes the transfer of an easement interest in lands for a portion of the Project 70 lands owned by the Pennsylvania Fish and Boat Commission, known as Lake Winola Access, which are more particularly described under subsection (c), to the Department of Transportation.(b) Project 70 restrictions.--The title interests described under subsection (c) shall be transferred with none of the existing restrictions currently imposed by the Project 70 Land Acquisition and Borrowing Act upon conveyance of the lands to the Department of Transportation. Mitigation for the loss of Project 70 lands shall consist of increased public access and safety.(c) Property description.--The interests in the parcels of land to be transferred with none of the existing Project 70 20250HB0553PN1938 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 restrictions are located in Overfield Township, Wyoming County, and are as follows:Right of WayParcel 1AN EASEMENT UPON ALL THAT CERTAIN parcel of land located along the northwesterly line of the Legal Right of Way of State Route 2031 (Lake Road) and being further located as:COMMENCING from a point located at the centerline intersection of SR 2031 (Lake Road) and SR 0307 (Roosevelt Highway). Said POINT OF COMMENCEMENT being located at:Latitude North 41 degrees 30 minutes 27.59 seconds;Longitude West 75 degrees 50 minutes 32.98 seconds;thence from said POINT OF COMMENCEMENT, North 14 degrees 10 minutes 11 seconds East along the centerline of SR 2031 418.79 feet to a point of curvature; thence along the centerline of SR 2031 and along a curve to the right with a radius of 251.00 feet, an arc distance of 92.21 feet, a chord bearing of North 24 degrees 41 minutes 38 seconds East 91.69 feet to a point; thence leaving the centerline of SR 2031, North 54 degrees 46 minutes 56 seconds West, 20.00 feet to a point on the northwesterly line of the Legal Right of Way of State Route 2031 (Lake Road), the POINT OF BEGINNING of the Parcel 1 Required Highway Right of Way;thence from the POINT OF BEGINNING, along the northwestern right of way of SR 2031 (Lake Road) and along a curve to the left with a radius of 271.00 feet, an arc distance of 9.72 feet and a chord bearing of South 34 degrees 11 minutes 26 seconds West 9.72 feet to a point; thence leaving the northwestern right of way of SR 2031 (Lake Road) and through the property of the Pennsylvania Fish and Boat Commission the following three 20250HB0553PN1938 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 courses and distances:North 56 degrees 50 minutes 12 seconds West, 21.00 feet to a point;North 34 degrees 11 minutes 26 seconds East, 10.47 feet to a point;South 54 degrees 46 minutes 56 seconds East, 21.00 feet to a point, the POINT OF BEGINNING.Containing 211.64 square feet (0.0049 acres).Slope EasementParcel 2AN EASEMENT UPON ALL THAT CERTAIN parcel of land located along the northwesterly line of the Legal Right of Way of State Route 2031 (Lake Road) and being further located as:COMMENCING from a point located at the centerline intersection of SR 2031 (Lake Road) and SR 0307 (Roosevelt Highway). Said POINT OF COMMENCEMENT being located at:Latitude North 41 degrees 30 minutes 27.59 seconds;Longitude West 75 degrees 50 minutes 32.98 seconds;thence from said POINT OF COMMENCEMENT, North 14 degrees 10 minutes 11 seconds East along the centerline of SR 2031 418.79 feet to a point of curvature; thence along the centerline of SR 2031 and along a curve to the right with a radius of 251.00 feet, an arc distance of 92.21 feet, chord bearing of North 24 degrees 41 minutes 38 seconds East 91.69 feet to a point; thence leaving the centerline of SR 2031, North 54 degrees 46 minutes 56 seconds West 20.00 feet to a point on the northwesterly line of the Legal Right of Way of State Route 2031 (Lake Road), the POINT OF BEGINNING of the Parcel 2 Slope Easement;thence from the POINT OF BEGINNING, leaving the northwestern right of way of SR 2031 (Lake Road) and through the property of 20250HB0553PN1938 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the Pennsylvania Fish and Boat Commission, the following nine courses and distances:North 54 degrees 46 minutes 56 seconds West 21.00 feet to a point;South 34 degrees 11 minutes 26 seconds West 3.49 feet to a point;North 51 degrees 19 minutes 28 seconds West 17.08 feet to a point;North 50 degrees 36 minutes 41 seconds West 16.05 feet to a point;North 38 degrees 21 minutes 11 seconds East 38.14 feet to a point;North 41 degrees 43 minutes 01 second East 60.53 feet to a point;South 48 degrees 16 minutes 59 seconds East 26.00 feet to a point;North 41 degrees 43 minutes 01 second East 18.00 feet to a point;South 46 degrees 14 minutes 15 seconds East 28.02 feet to a point located in the northwesterly line of the Legal Right of Way of State Route 2031 (Lake Road);thence along the northwesterly line of the Legal Right of Way of State Route 2031 (Lake Road), South 41 degrees 43 minutes 01 second West 77.53 feet to a point; thence along the same and along a curve to the left with a radius of 271.00 feet, an arc distance of 30.74 feet and a chord bearing of South 38 degrees 28 minutes 03 seconds West 30.72 feet to a point, the POINT OF BEGINNING.Containing 5,650.39 square feet (0.13 acres).Section 3. Conveyance in Charleston Township, Tioga County.20250HB0553PN1938 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (a) Authorization for land conveyance and property description.--The Department of General Services, with the approval of the Governor and the Department of Military and Veterans Affairs, is hereby authorized on behalf of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania to grant and convey to Tioga County a tract of land preliminarily described as follows, the final description to be determined upon completion of subdivision, together with any buildings, structures and improvements thereon, being a part of the grounds of the Wellsboro Readiness Center, as part of a land exchange, under terms and conditions to be established in an agreement of sale:ALL THAT CERTAIN lot of land situate in Charleston Township, Tioga County, Pennsylvania, designated as Lot A, as surveyed by Land Services Group, dated September 5, 2023, titled "Land Swap Subdivision Between Lands of The Commonwealth of Pennsylvania and The County of Tioga," being bounded and described as follows:BEGINNING at point along the existing centerline of Shumway Hill Road, said point being a corner in common with lands of The County of Tioga, the Grantee herein, having a reference of Deed Book 94 at page 58, and shown as Lot B-1 on the above referenced subdivision plan, being a corner in common with remaining lands of The Commonwealth of Pennsylvania, having a reference of Record Book 739 at page 7553, and shown as Lot A-1 on the above referenced subdivision plan, said point being the northeasterly corner of the lot herein described; THENCE, leaving Lot B-1 and along Lot A-1 and with the existing centerline of Shumway Hill Road, S 09° 18' 32" E, a distance of 60.41 ft. to a point; THENCE, leaving the existing centerline of Shumway Hill Road and continuing along Lot A-1, passing through an iron rod set 30.0 20250HB0553PN1938 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 ft. from said centerline and passing through an iron rod set 55.0 ft. from a point along the tributary to Charleston Creek, S 87° 20' 03" W, a distance of 331.11 ft. to a point along said tributary to Charleston Creek, being a corner in common with aforementioned Lot B-1; THENCE, leaving Lot A-1 and along Lot B-1 and through the bounds of the tributary to Charleston Creek, N 23° 11' 19" E, a distance of 66.67 ft. to a point; and, passing through an iron rod found 27.9 ft. from the aforementioned existing centerline of Shumway Hill Road, N 87° 20' 03" E, a distance of 295.04 ft. to the POINT OF BEGINNING.CONTAINING 0.431 ac. or approximately 18,780 sq. ft.(b) Authorization for acceptance of land and property description.--The Department of General Services, with the approval of the Governor and the Department of Military and Veterans Affairs, is hereby authorized on behalf of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania to accept from Tioga County a tract of land preliminarily described as follows, the final description to be determined upon completion of subdivision, together with any buildings, structures and improvements thereon, as part of a land exchange, under terms and conditions to be established in an agreement of sale:ALL THAT CERTAIN lot of land situate in Charleston Township, Tioga County, Pennsylvania, designated as Lot B, as surveyed by Land Services Group, dated September 5, 2023, titled "Land Swap Subdivision Between Lands of The Commonwealth of Pennsylvania and The County of Tioga" being bounded and described as follows:BEGINNING at point along the existing centerline of Shumway Hill Road, said point being a corner in common with lands of The Commonwealth of Pennsylvania, the Grantee herein, having a reference of Record Book 739 at page 7553, and shown as Lot A-1 20250HB0553PN1938 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 on the above referenced subdivision plan and being the northeasterly corner of the lot herein described; THENCE, leaving Lot A-1 and with the existing centerline of Shumway Hill Road, S 11° 11' 02" E, a distance of 73.60 ft. to a point, being a corner in common with remaining lands of The County of Tioga, having a reference of Deed Book 94 at page 58, and shown as Lot B-1 on the above referenced subdivision plan; THENCE, leaving the existing centerline of Shumway Hill Road and along Lot B-1, passing through an iron rod set 30.0 ft. from said centerline, S 78° 10' 06" W, a distance of 257.26 ft. to an iron rod set, and, N 07° 50' 01" W, a distance of 73.78 ft. to an iron rod found at a corner in common with aforementioned Lot A-1; THENCE, leaving Lot B-1 and along Lot A-1, passing through an iron rod found 34.2 ft. from the aforementioned existing centerline of Shumway Hill Road, N 78° 10' 06" E, a distance of 252.94 ft. to the POINT OF BEGINNING.CONTAINING 0.431 ac. or approximately 18,780 sq. ft.BEING a portion of a larger tract of land conveyed by Benjamin Austin and Fanny J. Austin, his wife, to Tioga County by deed dated December 8, 1866 and recorded in Tioga County Deed Book 40 at Page 382; by Horatio Austin and Mollie D. Austin, his wife, to The County of Tioga, by deed dated September 8, 1891 and recorded in Tioga County Deed Book 94 at page 58; and by Arthur M. Brewster and Harriet E. Brewster, his wife, to Tioga County by deed dated June 6, 1894 and recorded in Tioga County Deed Book 101 at page 343.(c) Conditions.--The conveyance authorized by subsection (a) shall be made under and subject to all lawful and enforceable easements, servitudes and rights of others, including, but not confined to, streets, roadways and rights of any telephone, 20250HB0553PN1938 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 telegraph, water, electric, gas or pipeline companies, as well as under and subject to any lawful and enforceable estates or tenancies vested in third persons appearing of record, for any portion of the land or improvements erected thereon.(d) Prohibition.--The conveyance authorized by subsection (a) shall be made under and subject to the condition, which shall be contained in the deed of conveyance, that no portion of the property conveyed shall be used as a licensed facility, as defined in 4 Pa.C.S. § 1103 (relating to definitions), or any other similar type of facility authorized under State law. The condition shall be a covenant running with the land and shall be binding upon the grantee, its successors and assigns. Should the grantee, its successors or assigns, permit any portion of the property authorized to be conveyed by subsection (a) to be used in violation of this subsection, the title shall immediately revert to and revest in the grantor.(e) Restrictions.--The Secretary of General Services may include in the deed of conveyance authorized by subsection (a) any covenants, conditions or restrictions on the property as determined to be in the best interests of the Commonwealth.(f) Easements.--The Department of General Services is hereby authorized, on behalf of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania, to grant any easements benefiting the property to be conveyed under subsection (a), or to retain any easements from the property to be conveyed under subsection (a), as the Secretary of General Services shall determine to be necessary or appropriate.(g) Deed of conveyance.--The conveyance authorized by subsection (a) shall be made by special warranty deed to be executed by the Secretary of General Services in the name of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania.20250HB0553PN1938 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (h) Costs and fees.--Any title insurance premiums, recording fees and any other costs and fees incurred by the Department of General Services, or otherwise incidental to the land exchange authorized by this section, shall be borne by Tioga County.(i) Expiration.--If the land exchange is not effectuated within three years after the effective date of this subsection, the authority provided under this section shall expire.SECTION 4. CONVEYANCE PARTLY IN NESQUEHONING BOROUGH AND PARTLY IN LEHIGH TOWNSHIP, CARBON COUNTY.(A) AUTHORIZATION TO CONVEY PROPERTY.--THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL SERVICES, ON BEHALF OF THE COMMONWEALTH OF PENNSYLVANIA, WITH THE APPROVAL OF THE DEPARTMENT OF CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES AND THE GOVERNOR, IS HEREBY AUTHORIZED TO GRANT AND CONVEY TO THE COMMONWEALTH OF PENNSYLVANIA, SOLELY FOR THE USE OF THE PENNSYLVANIA GAME COMMISSION, A PARCEL IN LEHIGH TOWNSHIP, CARBON COUNTY, IN EXCHANGE FOR A TRACT PARTLY IN NESQUEHONING BOROUGH AND PARTLY IN LEHIGH TOWNSHIP, CARBON COUNTY, TO BE CONVEYED TO THE COMMONWEALTH OF PENNSYLVANIA, ACTING BY AND THROUGH THE DEPARTMENT OF CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES AND ADDED TO LEHIGH GORGE STATE PARK, AS DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (D).(B) PROPERTY DESCRIPTION.--THE PROPERTY TO BE CONVEYED IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (A) CONSISTS OF A PARCEL TOTALING APPROXIMATELY 332.3 ACRES AND IMPROVEMENTS THEREON, BOUNDED AND MORE PARTICULARLY DESCRIBED AS FOLLOWS:ALL THAT CERTAIN TRACT OR PIECE OF LAND IN THE TOWNSHIP OF LEHIGH, COUNTY OF CARBON, COMMONWEALTH OF PENNSYLVANIA BEING THE GREATER PART OF THE WARRANTEE OF JOHN OLDEN, BOUNDED AND DESCRIBED AS FOLLOWS:BEGINNING AT A POINT ON THE NORTHWESTERLY LINE OF CONSOLIDATED 20250HB0553PN1938 - 13 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 RAIL CORPORATION AT THE SOUTHERN BOUNDARY LINE OF THE JOHN OLDEN WARRANT; THENCE NORTH 82° 40'47" WEST 1,346.40 FEET TO A POINT IN LINE OF STATE GAME LANDS NO. 141; THENCE ALONG THE SAME THE FOLLOWING FOUR (4) COURSES AND DISTANCES: NORTH 2° 25' 47" WEST 1,608.70 FEET TO A POINT, A CORNER IN THE PENNSYLVANIA STATE GAME LANDS; NORTH 82° 04' 13" EAST 181.50 FEET TO A POINT, ANOTHER CORNER; NORTH 7°55'47" WEST 1,659.00 FEET TO A POINT, A CORNER; NORTH 82° 04' 13" EAST 3,602.51 FEET TO A POINT ON THE WESTERLY LINE OF CONSOLIDATED RAIL CORPORATION; THENCE SOUTHWARDLY, SOUTHWESTWARDLY, WESTWARDLY AND SOUTHWESTWARDLY 8,500 FEET TO A POINT AND PLACE OF BEGINNING.CONTAINING 332.3 ACRES.TOGETHER WITH THE RIGHT AND PRIVILEGE OF CROSSING THE LEHIGH RIVER TO AND FROM THE ABOVE-DESCRIBED PROPERTY ON A CATWALK OR BRIDGE SUSPENDED ACROSS THE LEHIGH RIVER FOR ACCESS TO AND FROM THE PROPERTY CONDEMNED BY THE COMMONWEALTH OF PENNSYLVANIA AGAINST JOHN J. SNYDER ET AL.AND ALSO ALL THE RIGHT TITLE AND INTEREST OF HENRY PAUL BECK AND / OR TIDEWATER OIL COMPANY IN AND TO THE REVERSION OR TERMINABLE ESTATE OF THE RAILROADS IN AND ALONG STRIPS OF LAND BETWEEN THE LEHIGH RIVER AND THE ABOVE DESCRIBED PROPERTY.BEING THE SAME LANDS WHICH THE COMMONWEALTH OF PENNSYLVANIA, ACTING BY AND THROUGH THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL SERVICES CONDEMNED FROM TIDEWATER OIL COMPANY; HENRY PAUL BECK ESTATE AND ANY OTHER PERSONS OR NAMES HAVING AN INTEREST IN THE PROPERTY, BY DECLARATION OF TAKING, DATED DECEMBER 17, 1981, NO. 81-5-548 IN THE COURT OF COMMON PLEAS OF CARBON COUNTY, PENNSYLVANIA, AND ALSO BEING PARCEL NUMBER 81-27-B4.(C) AUTHORIZATION TO RECEIVE PROPERTY.--THE DEPARTMENT OF CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES, WITH THE APPROVAL OF THE 20250HB0553PN1938 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 GOVERNOR, IS HEREBY AUTHORIZED ON BEHALF OF THE COMMONWEALTH OF PENNSYLVANIA TO RECEIVE THAT CERTAIN TRACT OF LAND SITUATED PARTLY IN LEHIGH TOWNSHIP AND PARTLY IN NESQUEHONING BOROUGH AS DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (D) IN EXCHANGE FOR THAT PROPERTY TO BE CONVEYED TO THE COMMONWEALTH OF PENNSYLVANIA, SOLELY FOR THE USE OF THE PENNSYLVANIA GAME COMMISSION, IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (A).(D) PROPERTY DESCRIPTION.--THE COMMONWEALTH OF PENNSYLVANIA AND THE PENNSYLVANIA GAME COMMISSION SHALL GRANT AND CONVEY TO THE COMMONWEALTH OF PENNSYLVANIA, ACTING BY AND THROUGH THE DEPARTMENT OF CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES, A TRACT PARTLY IN NESQUEHONING BOROUGH AND PARTLY IN LEHIGH TOWNSHIP, CARBON COUNTY, TO BE ADDED TO LEHIGH GORGE STATE PARK. THE TRACT TO BE CONVEYED CONSISTS OF APPROXIMATELY 449 ACRES AND IMPROVEMENTS DESCRIBED AS FOLLOWS:THIS TRACT, REFERRED TO AS THE GLEN ONOKO TRACT, IS GENERALLY BOUND ON THE WEST BY JEAN'S RUN, THE SOUTH AND EAST BY EITHER THE LEHIGH RIVER OR THE LEHIGH VALLEY RAIL LINE AND THE NORTH BY A GRAVEL ACCESS ROAD REFERENCED AS NINE MILE LOOP TRAIL. THIS TRACT IS GENERALLY DEPICTED ON A MAP DEVELOPED JUNE 3, 2025 BY THE BUREAU OF STATE PARKS IN CONJUNCTION WITH THE PENNSYLVANIA GAME COMMISSION, ON FILE WITH THE BUREAU OF STATE PARKS, RESOURCE MANAGEMENT AND PLANNING DIVISION.BEING PART OF THREE TRACTS OF LAND ACQUIRED BY THE COMMONWEALTH OF PENNSYLVANIA, SOLELY FOR THE USE OF THE PENNSYLVANIA GAME COMMISSION THROUGH THE FOLLOWING DEEDS:PARCEL 95-43-B1: DEED FROM THE TRUSTEES OF PHILADELPHIA YEARLY MEETING OF FRIENDS GRANTED AND CONVEYED UNTO THE COMMONWEALTH OF PENNSYLVANIA, FOR USE OF THE PENNSYLVANIA GAME COMMISSION, BY DEED DATED MAY 17, 1950 AND RECORDED AT CARBON COUNTY DEED BOOK 20250HB0553PN1938 - 15 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 162, PAGE 274.PARCEL 95-27-A1: DEED FROM THE LEHIGH VALLEY RAILROAD COMPANY GRANTED AND CONVEYED UNTO THE COMMONWEALTH OF PENNSYLVANIA, FOR USE OF THE PENNSYLVANIA GAME COMMISSION, BY DEED DATED NOVEMBER 18, 1952 AND RECORDED AT CARBON COUNTY DEED BOOK 169, PAGE 275.PARCEL 81-27-B5: DEED FROM THE TAX CLAIM BUREAU OF CARBON COUNTY GRANTED AND CONVEYED UNTO THE COMMONWEALTH OF PENNSYLVANIA, FOR USE OF THE PENNSYLVANIA GAME COMMISSION, BY DEED DATED JULY 20, 1951 AND RECORDED AT CARBON COUNTY DEED BOOK 162, PAGE 746.THE FINAL DESCRIPTION WILL BE DETERMINED IN ACCORDANCE WITH A FINAL APPROVED SUBDIVISION PLAN TO BE PREPARED BY THE PENNSYLVANIA GAME COMMISSION.(E) EASEMENTS AND ENCUMBRANCES.--THE CONVEYANCES DESCRIBED IN THIS SECTION SHALL BE MADE CONCURRENTLY AND UNDER AND SUBJECT TO ALL LAWFUL AND ENFORCEABLE EASEMENTS, SERVITUDES AND RIGHTS OF OTHERS, INCLUDING, BUT NOT CONFINED TO, STREETS, ROADWAYS AND RIGHTS OF ANY TELEPHONE, TELEGRAPH, WATER, ELECTRIC, GAS OR PIPELINE COMPANIES, AS WELL AS UNDER AND SUBJECT TO ANY LAWFUL AND ENFORCEABLE ESTATES OR TENANCIES VESTED IN THIRD PERSONS APPEARING OF RECORD, FOR ANY PORTION OF THE LAND OR IMPROVEMENTS ERECTED THEREON.(F) DEEDS.--THE CONVEYANCES AUTHORIZED IN SUBSECTION (A) AND DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (D) SHALL BE MADE BY QUIT CLAIM DEEDS.Section 4 5. Effective date.This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB0553PN1938 - 16 - <--12345678910111213141516171819202122232425